Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.213

Medical program directors—Termination—Temporary delegation of authority.

If a medical program director terminates certification, that medical program director's authority may be delegated by the department to any other licensed physician for a period of thirty days, or until a new medical program director is certified, whichever comes first.

[ 1986 c 68 s 3.]